Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.72.070

Ballot title and summary—Notice.

Upon the filing of the ballot title and summary for a state initiative or referendum measure in the office of secretary of state, the secretary of state shall notify by telephone and by mail, and, if requested, by other electronic means, the person proposing the measure, the prime sponsor of a referendum bill or alternative to an initiative to the legislature, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, and any other individuals who have made written request for such notification of the exact language of the ballot title and summary.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1808. Prior: 2000 c 197 s 3; 1982 c 116 s 5; 1973 1st ex.s. c 118 s 3; 1965 c 9 s 29.79.050; prior: 1913 c 138 s 3, part; RRS s 5399, part. Formerly RCW 29.79.050.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—2000 c 197: See note following RCW 29A.72.050.